Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.410

Student education loan servicer licensee.

A student education loan servicer licensee must maintain liquidity, operating reserves, and a tangible net worth in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles as determined by the director. The director may adopt rules to implement this section. The director's obligations or duties under this section are subject to section 21, chapter 62, Laws of 2018.

[ 2018 c 62 s 7.]